Utah statutes.
4-1-6.   Fees and late charges.

 	If an annual registration, license, or other fee is imposed under any chapter of this code, it shall be determined by the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2).  If the renewal of the registration or license is conditioned, among other things, upon the payment of a renewal fee on or before a specified date, the department shall charge and collect the renewal fee and a late fee on any license or registration which is renewed after the date specified for renewal in the applicable chapter.  The renewal fee and late fee shall be determined by the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2).



Amended by Chapter 130, 1985 General Session

